Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.270

Service of criminal and civil process—Jurisdiction—Costs.

(1) All criminal and civil process issuing out of courts created under this title shall be directed to the chief of police of the city served by the court and/or to the sheriff of the county in which the court is held and/or the warrant officers and be by them executed according to law in any county of this state.

(2) No process of courts created under this title shall be executed outside the corporate limits of the city served by the court unless the person authorized by the process first contacts the applicable law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the process is to be served.

(3) Upon a defendant being arrested in another city or county the cost of arresting or serving process thereon shall be borne by the court issuing the process including the cost of returning the defendant from any county of the state to the city.

[ 2015 c 288 s 3; 1992 c 99 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 108 s 1.]